District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the "Marion S. Barry Summer Youth Employment Program Creditable
Service Benefit Amendment Act of 2025".

Sec. 2. The Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3 46; D.C.
Official Code§ 32-241 et seq.), is amended by adding new sections 2d and 2e 10 read as
follows:
"Sec 2d. Creditable service.
"Beginning with fiscal year 1980, participation in a SYEP will be credited toward
required vesting periods in the District retirement program for a participant who becomes a
District of Columbia government employee following the participant's successful completion
of the SYEP.

"Sec. 2e. Definitions.
"For the purposes of this act, the term:
“(1) "Date of enrollment" means the date on which a participant enrolls in a
SYEP.
"(2) "Out-of-school" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
2(46) of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, approved July 22,
2014 (128 Stat. 1429; 29 u.s.c.§3102(46).
"(3) "Summer youth jobs" and "SYEP" mean the Marion S. Summer Youth
Employment Program.".
Sec. 3. Section 2604( I) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1978, effective October I, 1987 (D.C. Law 7-27; D.C. Official Code§ J.
626.04(I)), is amended by adding a new subparagraph (D) to read as follows:
"(D) For the purposes of the Marion S. Barry Summer Youth Employment
Program ("SYEP"), established pursuant to the Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective
January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code§ 32-241 et seq.) ("SYEP act"), for a
participant of a SYEP who meets the requirements of section 2d of the SYEP act creditable
service shall be calculated to include service beginning on the date of enrollment, as defined in
section 2e of the SYEP act.".
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ l-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional

review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ 1-206.02(c)(l), and publication in the
District of Columbia Register.